Maine, session 132, LD240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17851, sub-§17, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 1, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
17. Member eligible to retire from plans with different normal retirement ages.
A member who meets eligibility requirements to retire from plans with different normal
retirement ages may retire and, at the election of the member, defer initiation of service
retirement benefits from any plan in which the benefits would be reduced because the
member has not reached normal retirement age. The deferral ends when the member
reaches normal retirement age for the plan. The election to defer is irrevocable and must
be made before payment of a service retirement benefit begins. Service retirement benefits
deferred under this subsection must be paid by the retirement system without an early
retirement reduction and without any retroactive payment for the deferral period. If the
member dies before the end of the deferral period, the deferral of benefits applies to any
continuing beneficiary payments for the same deferral period that would have been
applicable to the member. This subsection applies to a member with service credit from a
participating local district who retires under a plan in this chapter.
Page 1 - 132LR0870(02)